Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-417] Traffic safety education.
(a) The department may establish and administer a traffic safety education
program to be conducted at each public school for students from grades
kindergarten through twelve.

(b) The department may establish the requirements
for the position of traffic safety education specialist and may employ at least
one traffic safety education specialist for the purposes of this section. The
traffic safety education specialist may be paid out of fees allocated to the
director of commerce and consumer affairs from the special drivers education
fund account pursuant to section 431:10C-115. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next